Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-712
Death of owner of property; effect.

Loaned property in the possession of a museum at the time of the owner's death which would otherwise escheat to the state shall not so escheat but shall become the property of the museum to which it is loaned.

Laws 1996, LB 1276, § 12.